Colorado, session 2026A, HB1327.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 12 to article
1 of title 25.5 as follows:
PART 12
LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT ENTERPRISE
25.5-1-1201. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 12 IS THE "LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT ENTERPRISE ACT".
25.5-1-1202. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(a) LARGE EMPLOYERS PROVIDE JOBS FOR THOUSANDS OF
COLORADO WORKERS, BUT MANY LARGE EMPLOYERS DO NOT PROVIDE
AFFORDABLE HEALTH-CARE COVERAGE FOR WORKERS WHO WORK FEWER
THAN THIRTY HOURS PER WEEK OR ONE HUNDRED THIRTY HOURS PER
MONTH;
(b) MANY WORKERS WHO ARE NOT OFFERED
EMPLOYER-SPONSORED AFFORDABLE HEALTH COVERAGE ARE ENROLLED
IN AND RECEIVE STATE-SUBSIDIZED MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS;
(c) LARGE EMPLOYERS DIRECTLY BENEFIT FROM THEIR WORKERS'
PARTICIPATION IN STATE-SUBSIDIZED MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS,
WHICH PARTICIPATION KEEPS WORKERS HEALTHY, REDUCES LOST
-3- 1327

PRODUCTIVITY DUE TO WORKER ILLNESS, AND INCREASES WORKER
RETENTION; AND
(d) FURTHER, THE STATE'S INVESTMENT IN HEALTH CARE FOR
LARGE EMPLOYERS' WORKERS SUPPORTS A LARGE EMPLOYER'S BUSINESS
DECISION TO HOLD DOWN HOURS AND WAGES, WHICH REDUCES COSTS
BECAUSE:
(I) LARGE EMPLOYERS ARE NOT PROVIDING HEALTH COVERAGE
FOR MEDICAL CARE THAT EVERY WORKER NEEDS; AND
(II) THE AVAILABILITY OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS
SUPPORT THE RETENTION OF WORKERS IN CERTAIN JOBS AND REDUCE
LARGE EMPLOYERS' TRAINING COSTS THAT ARISE WHEN REPLACING
WORKERS WHO MAY OTHERWISE SEEK EMPLOYMENT THAT PROVIDES
AFFORDABLE HEALTH COVERAGE.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT ENTERPRISE
PROVIDES VALUABLE BENEFITS AND BUSINESS SERVICES TO LARGE
EMPLOYERS BY, IN EXCHANGE FOR PAYING THE LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-1206,
USING THE FEE REVENUE TO:
(I) IMPROVE THE HEALTH AND PRODUCTIVITY OF WORKERS FOR
WHOM A LARGE EMPLOYER DOES NOT PROVIDE AFFORDABLE HEALTH
COVERAGE BY SUPPORTING THE AVAILABILITY OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
BENEFITS AND HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS FOR THE LARGE EMPLOYER'S
WORKERS; AND
(II) PROVIDE REIMBURSEMENT GRANTS FOR LARGE EMPLOYERS'
COSTS FOR WORKERS WHO CHOOSE TO BUY INTO AN
EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION
-4- 1327

25.5-1-1207;
(b) NO OTHER ENTERPRISE CREATED SIMULTANEOUSLY OR WITHIN
THE PRECEDING FIVE YEARS SERVES PRIMARILY THE SAME PURPOSE AS THE
LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT ENTERPRISE AND THE
ENTERPRISE DOES NOT REQUIRE VOTER APPROVAL PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-77-108;
(c) IT IS NECESSARY, APPROPRIATE, AND IN THE BEST INTEREST OF
THE STATE TO ACKNOWLEDGE THAT, BY PROVIDING THE BENEFITS AND
SERVICES SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12, THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT ENTERPRISE ENGAGES IN ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED IN THE PURSUIT
OF A BENEFIT, GAIN, OR LIVELIHOOD AND THEREFORE OPERATES AS A
BUSINESS; AND
(d) CONSISTENT WITH THE DETERMINATION OF THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT IN NICHOLL V. E-470 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY, 896
P.2d 859 (COLO. 1995), THAT THE POWER TO IMPOSE TAXES IS
INCONSISTENT WITH ENTERPRISE STATUS UNDER SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE
X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY CONCLUDES
THAT THE REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE ENTERPRISE IS GENERATED BY A
FEE, NOT A TAX, BECAUSE THE MONEY CREDITED TO THE ENTERPRISE IS:
(I) IMPOSED FOR THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE OF ALLOWING THE
ENTERPRISE TO DEFRAY THE COSTS OF PROVIDING THE BUSINESS SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN THIS PART 12;
(II) COLLECTED AT RATES THAT ARE REASONABLY CALCULATED
BASED ON THE COSTS OF THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE ENTERPRISE;
AND
(III) NOT STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
24-77-102 (17), OR STATE REVENUES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-103.6
-5- 1327

(6)(c), AND DOES NOT COUNT AGAINST EITHER THE STATE FISCAL YEAR
SPENDING LIMIT IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION OR THE EXCESS STATE REVENUES CAP, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(b), SO LONG AS THE ENTERPRISE QUALIFIES AS
AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
25.5-1-1203. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 12, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "AFFORDABLE HEALTH COVERAGE" MEANS HEALTH COVERAGE
THAT IS EQUIVALENT TO THE MINIMUM ESSENTIAL COVERAGE REQUIRED
UNDER THE FEDERAL ACT AND THAT IS AFFORDABLE AND PROVIDES
MINIMUM VALUE, AS DETERMINED UNDER THE FEDERAL ACT AS IT EXISTED
ON DECEMBER 31, 2025.
(2) "BOARD" MEANS THE ENTERPRISE BOARD CREATED IN SECTION
25.5-1-1205.
(3) "DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE CREATED IN SECTION 24-1-117.
(4) (a) "EMPLOYER" MEANS A PERSON THAT CONDUCTS BUSINESS
IN THE STATE.
(b) "EMPLOYER" DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON THAT:

(I) IS A FRANCHISEE OF THE EMPLOYER;
(II) IS A NONPROFIT EMPLOYER;
(III) IS A PUBLIC EMPLOYER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 29-33-103 (6),
OR A PUBLIC ENTITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-10-103 (5); OR
(IV) HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT WITH ITS
-6- 1327

EMPLOYEES THAT INCLUDES AFFORDABLE HEALTH-CARE COVERAGE.
(5) "ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT ENTERPRISE CREATED IN THIS PART 12.
(6) "FEDERAL ACT" MEANS THE "PATIENT PROTECTION AND
AFFORDABLE CARE ACT", PUB.L. 111-148, AS AMENDED BY THE FEDERAL
"HEALTH CARE AND EDUCATION RECONCILIATION ACT OF 2010", PUB.L.
111-152, AS AMENDED, INCLUDING ANY FEDERAL REGULATIONS ADOPTED
UNDER THE FEDERAL ACT.
(7) "FEE" MEANS THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT
FEE CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-1206.
(8) "FUND" MEANS THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-1208.
(9) (a) "LARGE EMPLOYER" MEANS AN EMPLOYER WITH FIVE
HUNDRED OR MORE SUPPORTED WORKERS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(b) FOR PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (9)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DETERMINATION OF THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF WORKERS WHO ARE
RECEIVING MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS IN THE PRECEDING CALENDER
YEAR DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A WORKER WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD;
(II) A WORKER EMPLOYED AS A SEASONAL WORKER, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 8-70-103 (23.6); OR
(III) A WORKER WHO QUALIFIES FOR SOCIAL SECURITY DISABILITY
INSURANCE UNDER 42 U.S.C. SECS. 401 TO 433, SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY
INCOME UNDER 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1381 ET SEQ., OR A WORKER WHO IS
ENROLLED IN THE MEDICAID BUY-IN PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION
25.5-6-1404.
-7- 1327

(10) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS" MEANS BENEFITS PROVIDED
UNDER THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(11) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM" MEANS THE STATE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN ARTICLES 4, 5, AND 6 OF
THIS TITLE 25.5.
(12) "SUPPORTED WORKERS" MEANS, FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR,
THE AVERAGE OF THE NUMBER OF A LARGE EMPLOYER'S WORKERS WHO
RECEIVED MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS FOR ANY MONTH IN THE
CALENDAR YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE FIRST SIXTY DAYS OF
EMPLOYMENT. "SUPPORTED WORKERS" DOES NOT INCLUDE WORKERS WHO
QUALIFY FOR SOCIAL SECURITY DISABILITY INSURANCE UNDER 42 U.S.C.
SECS. 401 TO 433 OR SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME UNDER 42 U.S.C.
SEC .1381 ET SEQ.
(13) "WORKER" MEANS AN EMPLOYEE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
8-4-101 (5), OF A LARGE EMPLOYER.
25.5-1-1204. Large employer health-care support enterprise
- creation - purpose - reporting - repeal.
(1) THERE IS CREATED THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT ENTERPRISE. THE ENTERPRISE IS AND OPERATES AS A
GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUSINESS WITHIN THE STATE DEPARTMENT FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING THE BUSINESS ACTIVITIES DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION. THE ENTERPRISE IS A TYPE 1 ENTITY, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105, AND EXERCISES ITS POWERS AND PERFORMS
ITS DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS UNDER THE STATE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE ENTERPRISE IS CREATED FOR THE BUSINESS PURPOSE OF
IMPOSING, ASSESSING, AND COLLECTING THE LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-1206 AND TO
-8- 1327

USE THE FEE REVENUE TO SUPPORT THE HEALTH, PRODUCTIVITY, AND
RETENTION OF A LARGE EMPLOYER'S SUPPORTED WORKERS BY, AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD:
(a) SUPPORTING THE PAYMENT OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
PREMIUMS FOR WORKERS RECEIVING MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS
WHOSE COVERAGE IS NOT FUNDED BY THE HEALTHCARE AFFORDABILITY
AND SUSTAINABILITY HOSPITAL PROVIDER FEE CASH FUND PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b)(IV) AND ENSURING ACCESS TO HEALTH-CARE
PROVIDERS; AND
(b) PROVIDING REIMBURSEMENT GRANTS FOR LARGE EMPLOYERS'
COSTS FOR WORKERS WHO CHOOSE TO BUY INTO AN
EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-1207.

(3) THE ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES
OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION SO LONG AS IT
RETAINS THE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS
THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUES IN GRANTS, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-77-102 (7), FROM ALL COLORADO STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS COMBINED. SO LONG AS IT CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE,
THE ENTERPRISE IS NOT SUBJECT TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(4) IN FURTHERANCE OF THE BUSINESS PURPOSES OF THE
ENTERPRISE AND TO FULLY EXERCISE ITS POWERS AND DUTIES THROUGH
THE BOARD, THE ENTERPRISE HAS THE POWER AND DUTY TO:
(a) IMPOSE, ASSESS, AND COLLECT THE LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-1206;
-9- 1327

(b) ISSUE REVENUE BONDS PAYABLE FROM THE REVENUE OF THE
ENTERPRISE;
(c) PAY THE REASONABLE, DIRECT, AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS OF THE ENTERPRISE, INCLUDING THE REASONABLE ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE IN
CONNECTION WITH THEIR DUTIES RELATING TO THE FEE;
(d) (I) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH THIRD PARTIES, INCLUDING
THE STATE DEPARTMENT, TO ENGAGE THE SERVICES OF PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
ENTITIES, CONTRACTORS, OR CONSULTANTS FOR PROFESSIONAL AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND TO PROVIDE ADVICE AND OTHER SERVICES
RELATED TO CONDUCTING THE AFFAIRS OF THE ENTERPRISE.
(II) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE OFFICE SPACE AND
ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF TO THE ENTERPRISE, AS NEEDED, AT FAIR MARKET
RATES, PURSUANT TO A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (4)(d).
(e) ADOPT, AMEND, OR REPEAL RULES OR POLICIES FOR THE
REGULATION OF THE ENTERPRISE'S AFFAIRS AND THE CONDUCT OF THE
ENTERPRISE'S BUSINESS CONSISTENT WITH THIS PART 12;
(f) ENGAGE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR LEGAL
SERVICES;
(g) ENGAGE THE STATE DEPARTMENT AS NECESSARY TO REVIEW
ADMINISTRATIVE DATA FOR PURPOSES OF IDENTIFYING LARGE EMPLOYERS
AND DETERMINING A LARGE EMPLOYER'S NUMBER OF SUPPORTED
WORKERS;
(h) ENGAGE THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO COLLECT AND
ENFORCE THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE;
(i) PREPARE AND SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT OF THE ENTERPRISE'S
-10- 1327

ACTIVITIES AND FUNDING PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION;
(j) SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GRANTS OR OTHER MONEY FROM
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING MATCHING MONEY FOR THE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, IF AVAILABLE, AND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR
DONATIONS FROM OTHER PUBLIC AND PRIVATE SOURCES TO SUPPORT AND
ENHANCE ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES; EXCEPT THAT THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
NOT ACCEPT GRANTS FROM THE STATE OR FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
UNLESS THE COMBINED TOTAL OF ALL GRANTS FROM SUCH SOURCES IS
UNDER TEN PERCENT OF THE ENTERPRISE'S ANNUAL REVENUE; AND
(k) EXERCISE ALL RIGHTS AND POWERS NECESSARY OR INCIDENTAL
TO OR IMPLIED FROM THE SPECIFIC POWERS AND DUTIES GRANTED IN THIS
PART 12.
(5) (a) (I) ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PART 12, THE
STATE TREASURER MAY TRANSFER MONEY FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO
THE FUND FOR THE PURPOSE OF DEFRAYING EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE
ENTERPRISE BEFORE IT RECEIVES FEE REVENUE OR REVENUE BOND
PROCEEDS. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, THE ENTERPRISE MAY
ACCEPT AND EXPEND ANY MONEY SO TRANSFERRED, AND,
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY STATE FISCAL RULE OR GENERALLY ACCEPTED
ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLE THAT COULD OTHERWISE BE INTERPRETED TO
REQUIRE A CONTRARY CONCLUSION, THE TRANSFER IS A LOAN FROM THE
STATE TREASURER TO THE ENTERPRISE THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REPAID
AND IS NOT A GRANT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (2)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF
THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (7). ALL
MONEY TRANSFERRED AS A LOAN TO THE ENTERPRISE IS CREDITED TO THE
FUND OR TO AN ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND. LOAN LIABILITIES THAT ARE
RECORDED IN THE FUND BUT THAT ARE NOT REQUIRED TO BE PAID IN THE
-11- 1327

CURRENT FISCAL YEAR SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED WHEN CALCULATING
SUFFICIENT STATUTORY FUND BALANCE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION
24-75-109.
(II) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2029, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL REPAY
ANY LOAN RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION
AND ACCUMULATED INTEREST. INTEREST ACCRUES ON THE MONEY
BORROWED AT A RATE PER ANNUM ON THE MOST RECENTLY ISSUED
TEN-YEAR UNITED STATES TREASURY NOTE, ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST
ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT, AS REPORTED BY THE "WALL STREET
JOURNAL" AS OF THE DATE THE TRANSFER IS MADE, BEGINNING ON THAT
DATE AND CONTINUING UNTIL THE DATE ON WHICH THE MONEY IS REPAID.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
(6) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT
REGARDING ITS ACTIVITIES AND FUNDING AND PRESENT THE REPORT TO
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE,
OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ALSO POST
THE ANNUAL REPORT ON A PUBLIC-FACING WEBSITE. NOTWITHSTANDING
THE REQUIREMENT IN SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), THE REQUIREMENT TO
SUBMIT A REPORT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (6) CONTINUES
INDEFINITELY.
(7) (a) THE BOARD IS SUBJECT TO THE OPEN MEETINGS
PROVISIONS OF THE "COLORADO SUNSHINE ACT OF 1972", CONTAINED IN
PART 4 OF ARTICLE 6 OF TITLE 24. EXCEPT AS MAY OTHERWISE BE
PROVIDED BY FEDERAL LAW OR STATE LAW, THE RECORDS OF THE
ENTERPRISE ARE PUBLIC RECORDS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-72-202 (6),
AND ARE SUBJECT TO THE "COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF
-12- 1327

ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24.
(b) NOTHING IN THIS PART 12 AUTHORIZES THE DISCLOSURE TO
THE PUBLIC BY THE ENTERPRISE, THE BOARD, THE STATE, OR AN EMPLOYER
OR ITS AGENT OF ANY INFORMATION THAT WOULD IDENTIFY A SPECIFIC
WORKER OR A SPECIFIC WORKER'S STATUS AS A RECIPIENT OF MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE BENEFITS.
(8) THE ENTERPRISE IS A PUBLIC ENTITY FOR PURPOSES OF PART 2
OF ARTICLE 57 OF TITLE 11.
25.5-1-1205. Enterprise board of directors - creation -
appointment - duties - rules - repeal.
(1) THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT ENTERPRISE IS
GOVERNED BY THE ENTERPRISE BOARD OF DIRECTORS. THE BOARD
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING NINE VOTING MEMBERS:
(a) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S
DESIGNEE; AND
(b) EIGHT MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WITH THE
ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE, INCLUDING:
(I) TWO MEMBERS WHO ARE HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS WHO SERVE
PATIENTS WHO RECEIVE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A WORKER WHO RECEIVES OR HAS
RECEIVED MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS WHILE EMPLOYED;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS A LOCAL CHAMBER OF
COMMERCE;
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS A LARGE EMPLOYER;
(V) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS A COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN OR SOCIAL SERVICES;
(VI) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS A LABOR ORGANIZATION;
-13- 1327

AND
(VII) ONE MEMBER WHO HAS EXPERTISE IN HEALTH INSURANCE.
(2) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION, OF
THE FIRST MEMBERS APPOINTED TO THE BOARD PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(1)(b) OF THIS SECTION, TWO MEMBERS SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF
TWO YEARS.
(b) THE GOVERNOR SHALL MAKE THE INITIAL APPOINTMENTS TO
THE BOARD NO LATER THAN NOVEMBER 1, 2026.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(3) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S
DESIGNEE IS THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD.
(4) (a) MEMBERS OF THE BOARD APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR
SERVE THREE-YEAR TERMS AND SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THE
GOVERNOR AND MAY BE REMOVED BY THE GOVERNOR. A MEMBER OF THE
BOARD MAY SERVE AN UNLIMITED NUMBER OF CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(b) A MEMBER APPOINTED TO FILL A VACANCY SERVES THE
REMAINDER OF THE UNEXPIRED TERM OF THE MEMBER WHOSE VACANCY
IS BEING FILLED.
(c) MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION BUT
MAY BE REIMBURSED FROM MONEY IN THE FUND FOR ACTUAL,
REASONABLE, AND NECESSARY EXPENSES, INCLUDING TRAVEL, FOOD, AND
LODGING, INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 12.
(5) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AS OFTEN AS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT ITS DUTIES. THE BOARD HAS THE POWER AND DUTY TO:
(a) IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE ENTERPRISE;
(b) ESTABLISH BYLAWS, AS APPROPRIATE AND CONSISTENT WITH
-14- 1327

THIS PART 12, FOR THE BOARD'S EFFECTIVE OPERATION;
(c) ESTABLISH ADMINISTRATIVE AND ACCOUNTING PROCEDURES
FOR THE OPERATION OF THE ENTERPRISE;
(d) PRIOR TO THE IMPLEMENTATION OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES, AND
AS NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE THEREAFTER, ADOPT RULES OR POLICIES
CONCERNING:
(I) THE DETERMINATION AND CALCULATION OF AN EMPLOYER'S
SUPPORTED WORKERS;
(II) THE DETERMINATION OF THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE PAID BY
EACH LARGE EMPLOYER;
(III) THE USE OF ENTERPRISE REVENUE TO SUPPORT THE PAYMENT
OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM PREMIUMS FOR WORKERS RECEIVING
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS WHOSE COVERAGE IS NOT FUNDED BY THE
HEALTHCARE AFFORDABILITY AND SUSTAINABILITY HOSPITAL PROVIDER
FEE CASH FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(b)(IV) AND TO
ENSURE THE AVAILABILITY OF HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS WHO SERVE
SUPPORTED WORKERS; AND
(IV) REIMBURSEMENT GRANTS FOR LARGE EMPLOYERS' COSTS FOR
WORKERS WHO CHOOSE TO BUY INTO AN EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-1-1207; AND
(e) NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN
SEPTEMBER 1, EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE
THE PERCENTAGE ALLOCATION OF FEE REVENUE FOR THE USES OF
ENTERPRISE REVENUE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTIONS (5)(d)(III) AND
(5)(d)(IV) OF THIS SECTION.
25.5-1-1206. Large employer health-care support fee - annual
employer report - imposition and collection of enterprise fee - penalty
-15- 1327

- rules - repeal.
(1) FOR THE 2027 CALENDAR YEAR, AND CONTINUING EACH
CALENDAR YEAR THEREAFTER, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL IMPOSE, ASSESS,
AND COLLECT THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE FROM
EACH LARGE EMPLOYER.
(2) (a) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN
EACH JANUARY 31 THEREAFTER, EVERY EMPLOYER THAT EMPLOYED FIVE
HUNDRED OR MORE EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE AT ANY TIME DURING THE
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR SHALL REPORT TO THE ENTERPRISE THE
EMPLOYER'S FEDERAL EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER, THE AVERAGE
NUMBER OF FULL-TIME, PART-TIME, AND 1099 EMPLOYEES, AND THE
NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS SUBCONTRACTED FOR THE PRIMARY WORK OF
THE EMPLOYER, AND, WITH RESPECT TO EACH OF THE EMPLOYER'S
EMPLOYEES THAT WERE EMPLOYED AT ANY TIME DURING THE PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR:
(A) THE EMPLOYEE'S FULL LEGAL NAME AND DATE OF BIRTH;
(B) THE DATES WHEN THE EMPLOYEE WAS EMPLOYED DURING THE
YEAR;
(C) THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF HOURS WORKED PER MONTH FOR
EACH EMPLOYEE; AND
(D) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE ENTERPRISE.
(II) THE ENTERPRISE MAY REQUIRE AN EMPLOYER TO FILE THE
REPORT REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION
ELECTRONICALLY.
(III) THE ENTERPRISE MAY EXEMPT AN EMPLOYER FROM FILING
THE REPORT REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION IF THE EMPLOYER DEMONSTRATES TO THE ENTERPRISE, IN THE
-16- 1327

FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE ENTERPRISE, THAT THE
EMPLOYER PROVIDES AFFORDABLE HEALTH COVERAGE TO ALL WORKERS
WORKING TWENTY OR MORE HOURS PER WEEK OR EIGHTY OR MORE HOURS
PER MONTH.
(IV) (A) IF AN EMPLOYER NEGLECTS OR REFUSES TO FILE A REPORT
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, OR TO PROVIDE A
COPY OF RECORDS AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2)(e) OF THIS SECTION,
THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ESTIMATE THE AMOUNT OF THE LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE DUE USING THE BEST INFORMATION THAT MAY
BE AVAILABLE. THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE MAY BE ESTIMATED AND
ASSESSED BY THE ENTERPRISE AT ANY TIME WITHIN THREE YEARS AFTER
THE REPORT IS DUE.
(B) IF AN EMPLOYER FILES A REPORT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, AND THERE IS A REASONABLE BELIEF BASED ON
THE INFORMATION PROVIDED IN THE REPORT OR FROM INFORMATION
SUBMITTED IN PRIOR OR SUBSEQUENT ANNUAL EMPLOYER REPORTS THAT
THE EMPLOYER HAS INTENTIONALLY MISCLASSIFIED OR RECLASSIFIED
EMPLOYEES AS FULL-TIME, PART-TIME, 1099, OR SUBCONTRACTED
EMPLOYEES TO AVOID PAYING THE FEE, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL SEND A
NOTICE OF REVIEW TO THE EMPLOYER AND PERMIT THE EMPLOYER TO
SUBMIT CORRECTED OR UPDATED INFORMATION. THE EMPLOYER MUST
SUBMIT CORRECTED OR UPDATED INFORMATION TO THE ENTERPRISE
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS. THE EMPLOYER MAY REQUEST A HEARING ON THE
INFORMATION IN THE REPORT OR THE CORRECTED OR UPDATED
INFORMATION. IF, AFTER THE REVIEW IS COMPLETED, THE ENTERPRISE
DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS INTENTIONALLY MISCLASSIFIED OR
RECLASSIFIED EMPLOYEES IN AN ANNUAL EMPLOYER REPORT, THE
-17- 1327

EMPLOYER IS SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO THAN FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS
FOR EACH MISCLASSIFIED OR RECLASSIFIED EMPLOYEE.
(b) (I) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 31, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN EACH
MARCH 31 THEREAFTER, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER AN
EMPLOYER IS A LARGE EMPLOYER, CALCULATE AND IMPOSE THE LARGE
EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE DUE FOR EACH LARGE EMPLOYER,
AND SEND WRITTEN NOTICE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)(IV) OF THIS
SECTION TO EACH LARGE EMPLOYER AND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE.
(II) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE
THAT IS REASONABLE BASED ON THE COST OF SERVICES PROVIDED TO
LARGE EMPLOYERS, INCLUDING MEDICAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES PROVIDED
TO SUPPORTED WORKERS, WHICH FEE AMOUNT THE ENTERPRISE MAY
ADJUST PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL DETERMINE THE NUMBER OF
SUPPORTED WORKERS FOR EACH EMPLOYER USING AVAILABLE
ADMINISTRATIVE DATA AND DATA FROM THE ANNUAL EMPLOYER REPORT
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION. THE
ENTERPRISE SHALL ENTER INTO DATA-SHARING AGREEMENTS WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE AND THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT, IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER AGENCIES WITH DATA
NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(IV) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ISSUE TO EACH LARGE EMPLOYER AND
TRANSMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE A WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE
AMOUNT OF THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE DUE,
INSTRUCTIONS FOR PAYING THE FEE, AND AN EXPLANATION OF THE
PROCEDURE TO REVIEW THE IDENTIFICATION AS A LARGE EMPLOYER, TO
-18- 1327

REVIEW THE CALCULATION OF SUPPORTED WORKERS, OR TO CLAIM THE
EXEMPTION FROM THE FEE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS
SECTION. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
A LARGE EMPLOYER SHALL PAY THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT FEE BY AUGUST 1, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN AUGUST 1
THEREAFTER IN THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE FEE IS IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) (I) WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE NOTICE ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)(IV) OF THIS SECTION, THE EMPLOYER TO
WHOM NOTICE WAS ISSUED MAY FILE WITH THE ENTERPRISE A WRITTEN
REQUEST FOR REVIEW. THE REQUEST MUST SET FORTH THE REASONS FOR
REQUESTED CHANGES TO THE NOTICE. THE REQUEST MAY STATE A CLAIM
OF EXEMPTION FROM THE FEE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS
SECTION. THE EMPLOYER REQUESTING REVIEW HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF
WITH RESPECT TO ISSUES RAISED IN THE REQUEST. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE WHEN A REQUEST FOR REVIEW IS
MADE BY AN EMPLOYER, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL HOLD
IN ABEYANCE ANY ACTION TO COLLECT THE FEE UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE RECEIVES NOTICE OF THE ENTERPRISE'S FINAL
DETERMINATION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) UNLESS THE ENTERPRISE SUMMARILY CANCELS THE NOTICE,
THE ENTERPRISE SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON THE REQUEST FOR REVIEW.
BASED UPON THE EVIDENCE PRESENTED AT THE HEARING OR FILED WITH
THE REQUEST, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL MAKE A FINAL DETERMINATION ON
THE REQUEST. THE ENTERPRISE MAY AFFIRM, MODIFY, OR CANCEL THE
NOTICE OR MAY GRANT AN EXEMPTION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(2)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION. AN EMPLOYER IS NOT ENTITLED TO A SECOND
-19- 1327

HEARING REGARDING THE NOTICE. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL PROVIDE
WRITTEN NOTICE OF ITS FINAL DETERMINATION TO THE EMPLOYER AND TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. THE LARGE EMPLOYER SHALL PAY THE
AMOUNT FOUND BY THE ENTERPRISE TO BE DUE WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER
THE MAILING OF THE FINAL DETERMINATION.
(d) (I) ONCE THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE
IS IMPOSED, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL EXEMPT A LARGE EMPLOYER FROM
PAYMENT OF THE FEE IF THE LARGE EMPLOYER DEMONSTRATES THAT THE
LARGE EMPLOYER HAS OFFERED AFFORDABLE HEALTH COVERAGE TO
WORKERS WHO WORK TWENTY OR MORE HOURS PER WEEK OR EIGHTY OR
MORE HOURS PER MONTH.
(II) IF AT ANY TIME DURING THE THREE YEARS FOLLOWING THE
GRANTING OF THE EXEMPTION BY THE ENTERPRISE THE LARGE EMPLOYER
CEASES OFFERING AFFORDABLE HEALTH COVERAGE TO EACH WORKER WHO
WORKS TWENTY OR MORE HOURS PER WEEK OR EIGHTY OR MORE HOURS
PER MONTH, THE LARGE EMPLOYER SHALL NOTIFY THE ENTERPRISE THAT
COVERAGE HAS CEASED. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL COMPUTE THE LARGE
EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN IMPOSED
SINCE THE DATE THE EXEMPTION WAS GRANTED AND ISSUE THE LARGE
EMPLOYER THE NOTICE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(b)(IV) OF THIS
SECTION. THE LARGE EMPLOYER MAY REQUEST REVIEW OF THE NOTICE AS
SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) EVERY EMPLOYER DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT
EMPLOYS FIVE HUNDRED OR MORE EMPLOYEES DURING THE CALENDAR
YEAR SHALL KEEP COMPLETE AND ACCURATE RECORDS NECESSARY FOR
THE DETERMINATION OF THE CORRECT AMOUNT OF THE LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE BY THE ENTERPRISE. AN EMPLOYER SHALL
-20- 1327

PROVIDE A COPY OF THE RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE KEPT PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e) AND ANY OTHER RECORDS DEEMED NECESSARY
BY THE ENTERPRISE FOR THE DETERMINATION OF THE CORRECT AMOUNT
OF THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE TO THE ENTERPRISE,
IF SO REQUESTED. THE ENTERPRISE MAY ESTABLISH THE ACCEPTABLE
FORM OF SUCH RECORDS.
(f) THE ENTERPRISE AND DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL ADOPT
POLICIES OR RULES CONSISTENT WITH THE RULES CONCERNING THE FILING
AND PAYMENT PROVISIONS OF SECTION 39-21-119 THAT APPLY TO THE
FILING AND PAYMENT DUTIES IMPOSED BY THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL COLLECT AND
ENFORCE THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE ON BEHALF
OF THE ENTERPRISE FOLLOWING NOTICE FROM THE ENTERPRISE TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)(IV) OF THIS
SECTION OR UPON RECEIPT OF NOTICE OF FINAL DETERMINATION
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL RETAIN AN AMOUNT
THAT DOES NOT EXCEED THE TOTAL COST OF COLLECTING,
ADMINISTERING, AND ENFORCING THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT FEE AND SHALL TRANSMIT THE AMOUNT RETAINED TO THE STATE
TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT IT TO THE APPROPRIATE CASH FUND FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(b) (I) IF A LARGE EMPLOYER DOES NOT PAY THE LARGE EMPLOYER
HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE DUE, THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL
ADD INTEREST, PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-21-110.5, TO THE UNPAID
AMOUNT AND A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE UNPAID
AMOUNT, PLUS ONE-HALF PERCENT PER MONTH FROM THE DATE WHEN
-21- 1327

DUE, NOT TO EXCEED EIGHTEEN PERCENT IN THE AGGREGATE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL PROCEED TO COLLECT
THE UNPAID AMOUNT, AND ANY INTEREST OR PENALTY ADDED TO THE
UNPAID AMOUNT, PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 21 OF TITLE 39 IN THE SAME
MANNER AS ANY UNPAID TAX, PENALTY, OR INTEREST ASSESSED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 21 OF TITLE 39. ALL METHODS OF COLLECTION AND
REMEDIES AUTHORIZED BY ARTICLE 21 OF TITLE 39 ARE AVAILABLE TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR PURPOSES OF ENFORCING THIS
SECTION.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL NOT FILE A NOTICE OF
LIEN, ISSUE A DISTRAINT WARRANT, INSTITUTE A SUIT FOR COLLECTION, OR
TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION TO COLLECT THE AMOUNT DUE MORE THAN
THREE YEARS AFTER THE PAYMENT IS DUE; EXCEPT THAT A NOTICE OF LIEN
THAT HAS BEEN FILED PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF THE THREE-YEAR
PERIOD SHALL CONTINUE FOR ONE YEAR AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF THE
THREE-YEAR PERIOD.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE MAY:
(I) GRANT A REASONABLE EXTENSION OF TIME FOR PAYING THE
LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE;
(II) WAIVE, FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN, ANY PENALTY OR INTEREST
ASSESSED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION;
(III) COMPROMISE ANY CIVIL CASE ARISING PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 39-21-106; AND
(IV) ADOPT, AMEND, OR RESCIND RULES NECESSARY FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 4 OF
TITLE 24.
(d) EXCEPT FOR THE AMOUNT RETAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
-22- 1327

REVENUE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, MONEY
THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE COLLECTS PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION IS CUSTODIAL MONEY HELD TEMPORARILY BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE AND THE STATE TREASURER SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
TRANSFERRING THE MONEY TO THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE
SUPPORT FUND FOR USE BY THE ENTERPRISE. BASED ON THE ENTERPRISE'S
STATUS AS AN ENTERPRISE, THE MONEY COLLECTED AND TRANSFERRED TO
THE LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FUND IS NOT SUBJECT TO
SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION AT ANY TIME
DURING THE MONEY'S COLLECTION, TRANSFER, AND USE.
(4) (a) THE ENTERPRISE MAY ANNUALLY ADJUST THE FEE AS
DETERMINED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION FOR
INFLATION, TO REFLECT THE COST OF SERVICES PROVIDED TO LARGE
EMPLOYERS, INCLUDING MEDICAL ASSISTANCE COSTS FOR SUPPORTED
WORKERS OR FOR OTHER REASONS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD.
(b) (I) IF THE IMPOSITION OF THE FEE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(2)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION IS ESTIMATED TO RESULT IN THE COLLECTION OF
FEES AND SURCHARGES THAT EXCEED ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS IN
THE ENTERPRISE'S FIRST FIVE FISCAL YEARS, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
ADJUST THE FEES, LOWER THE FEES, OR STOP COLLECTING THE FEES IN
ORDER TO NOT COLLECT FEES OR SURCHARGES THAT EXCEED ONE
HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS IN THE ENTERPRISE'S FIRST FIVE FISCAL
YEARS, WHICH FIVE-YEAR PERIOD, FOR THE PURPOSE OF SECTION
24-77-108, ENDS ON JULY 1, 2030. THEREFORE, THE ENTERPRISE IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 24-77-108.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2031.
(5) THE ENTERPRISE MAY PAY, FROM FEE REVENUE RECEIVED BY
-23- 1327

THE ENTERPRISE, REASONABLE AND NECESSARY DIRECT AND INDIRECT
EXPENSES RELATING TO:
(a) SERVICES OR SUPPORT PROVIDED TO THE ENTERPRISE BY THE
STATE DEPARTMENT RELATING TO THE PURPOSES OF THE ENTERPRISE; AND
(b) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE'S COLLECTION AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THE FEE FROM LARGE EMPLOYERS AND TRANSMITTAL
OF THE FEE TO THE STATE TREASURER.
(6) FOR PURPOSES OF IMPOSING, ASSESSING, AND COLLECTING THE
FEE, AN EMPLOYER SHALL COMPLY WITH REQUESTS FOR DATA FROM THE
ENTERPRISE, AND ANY STATE AGENCIES REQUESTING DATA ON BEHALF OF
THE ENTERPRISE, THAT ARE NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE ENTERPRISE'S
POWERS AND DUTIES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 12.

25.5-1-1207. Worker buy-in program - access to large
employer-sponsored health coverage - employer reimbursement
grants - rules.
(1) THERE IS CREATED A WORKER BUY-IN PROGRAM TO USE
REVENUE FROM THE FEE TO AWARD GRANTS TO LARGE EMPLOYERS TO
REIMBURSE SOME OR ALL OF A LARGE EMPLOYER'S COSTS INCURRED IN
PROVIDING WORKERS ACCESS TO ENROLLMENT IN EMPLOYER-SPONSORED
HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR WORKERS WHO WORK AT LEAST TWENTY
HOURS PER WEEK OR EIGHTY HOURS PER MONTH, BUT WHO DO NOT WORK
THE MINIMUM HOURS NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR ENROLLMENT IN
EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS.
(2) A LARGE EMPLOYER THAT CHOOSES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
WORKER BUY-IN PROGRAM SHALL NOTIFY THE ENTERPRISE AND SATISFY
THE REQUIREMENTS FOR PARTICIPATION IN AND REIMBURSEMENT FROM
-24- 1327

THE PROGRAM.
(3) AFTER CONSULTATION WITH THE DIVISION OF INSURANCE AND
LARGE EMPLOYERS INTERESTED IN PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM, THE
BOARD SHALL ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING RULES:
(a) THAT ENSURE THAT FEE REVENUE ALLOCATED FOR THE
PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION IS USED TO INCENTIVIZE LARGE
EMPLOYERS THAT CHOOSE TO ALLOW PART-TIME WORKERS WHO DO NOT
OTHERWISE QUALIFY FOR ENROLLMENT IN EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH
BENEFIT PLANS, ON OR BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PART 20, TO
BUY INTO EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS;
(b) TO DETERMINE THE CRITERIA FOR AND THE AMOUNT OF LARGE
EMPLOYER REIMBURSEMENT GRANTS BASED ON AVAILABLE FEE REVENUE
AND THE NUMBER OF LARGE EMPLOYERS AND WORKERS PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM; AND
(c) THAT REQUIRE A PARTICIPATING LARGE EMPLOYER TO REPORT
TO THE ENTERPRISE INFORMATION NECESSARY TO VERIFY THE NUMBER OF
WORKERS PARTICIPATING IN THE WORKER BUY-IN PROGRAM AND THE
LARGE EMPLOYER'S COSTS FOR PROVIDING ACCESS TO ENROLLMENT IN AN
EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN FOR SUCH WORKERS.
25.5-1-1208. Large employer health-care support fund -
creation - use of money.
(1) THERE IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY THE LARGE
EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FUND. THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(a) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEE;
(b) MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE SALE OF REVENUE BONDS ISSUED
BY THE ENTERPRISE;
-25- 1327


(c) ANY MONEY LOANED TO THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-1204 (5);
(d) ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, DONATIONS, OR OTHER MONEY RECEIVED
BY THE ENTERPRISE;
(e) MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE FUND BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY; AND
(f) INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND
INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
FUND TO THE FUND.
(3) MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
ENTERPRISE:
(a) FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SECTION 25.5-1-1204 (4);
(b) TO SUPPORT WORKERS' ACCESS TO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
BENEFITS AND HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS;
(c) TO REIMBURSE LARGE EMPLOYERS' COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
PERMITTING WORKERS TO BUY INTO AN EMPLOYER-SPONSORED HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN; AND
(d) FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12.
25.5-1-1209. Severability.
IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS PART 12 OR THE APPLICATION OF THIS
PART 12 TO ANY PERSON OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD INVALID, THE
INVALIDITY DOES NOT AFFECT OTHER PROVISIONS OR APPLICATIONS OF
THIS PART 12 THAT CAN BE GIVEN EFFECT WITHOUT THE INVALID
PROVISION OR APPLICATION, AND TO THIS END THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
-26- 1327

PART 12 ARE DECLARED TO BE SEVERABLE.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-102, add (10)
as follows:
39-21-102. Scope.
(10) THIS ARTICLE 21 APPLIES TO THE FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25.5-1-1206, BUT ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT THIS ARTICLE 21 IS
NOT INCONSISTENT WITH SECTION 25.5-1-1206.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-113, add (40)
as follows:
39-21-113. Reports and returns - rule - repeal.
(40) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
CARE POLICY AND FINANCING SUCH DETAILED TAXPAYER INFORMATION
PERTINENT TO IMPOSING, ASSESSING, AND COLLECTING THE LARGE
EMPLOYER HEALTH-CARE SUPPORT FEE PURSUANT TO SECTION
25.5-1-1206. ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (40) MUST REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL, AND ALL PERSONS ARE
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS
SECTION AND THE PENALTIES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal
year, $59,625 is appropriated to the department of law. This appropriation
is from the legal services cash fund created in section 24-31-108 (4),
C.R.S., from revenue received from the large employer health-care
support enterprise that is continuously appropriated from the large
employer health-care support fund created in section 25.5-1-1207 (1),
-27- 1327

C.R.S. The appropriation to the department of law is based on an
assumption that the department will require an additional 0.3 FTE. To
implement this act, the department of law may use this appropriation to
provide legal services for the large employer health-care support
enterprise.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-28- 1327